Washington statutes.
RCW 36.95.090

County budget provisions applicable to district—Financing budget.

The provisions of chapter 36.40 RCW, relating to budgets, shall apply to the district. The budget of the district shall be financed by an excise tax imposed by the board, and described in RCW 36.95.100.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 155 s 9.]